North Carolina statutes. Chapter 21. Bills of Lading.
Article 5. Criminal Offenses.

§ 21-42.
Issuing false bills or violating Chapter made felony.

Any person who, knowingly or with intent to defraud, falsely makes, alters, forges, counterfeits, prints or photographs any bill of lading purporting to represent goods received for shipment in this State, or with intent utters or publishes as true and genuine any such falsely altered, forged, counterfeited, falsely printed or photographed bill of lading, knowing it to be falsely altered, forged, counterfeited, falsely printed or photographed, or aids in making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, printing, or photographing, or uttering or publishing the same, or issues or aids in issuing or procuring the issue of, or negotiates or transfers for value a bill which contains a false statement as to the receipt of the goods, or as to any other matter, or who, with intent to defraud, violates or fails to comply with, or aids in any violation of, or failure to comply with any provision of this Chapter, shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

History.

1919, c. 65, s. 41; c. 290; C.S., s. 323; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 23; 1981, c. 63; c. 179.